Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement

47-7-80.
Transfer of service credits from one fire department to another.

A firefighter’s or volunteer firefighter’s length of service may be transferable from one fire department to another by furnishing the board with a proper certificate.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 11; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-7-81.
Effect of failure of volunteer fire department to hold required drills; effect of volunteer firefighter’s failure to meet attendance requirements.

The board is authorized to prescribe the minimum monthly and annual number of hours of drills and meetings required to be conducted by a volunteer fire department as a condition to qualification of service by a firefighter or volunteer firefighter with such department for credit toward retirement and other benefits under this chapter.

Any volunteer fire department which fails to hold at least eight hours of drills and meetings per month for three months in any calendar year or such greater requirements as may be established by the board shall not be classified as a volunteer fire department for such calendar year, and the members of such department shall not be entitled to receive credit for service during such calendar year. Such members shall be entitled to a refund of 95 percent of the dues paid during such period.

The board is authorized to prescribe the monthly and annual percentage of attendance at drills, meetings, and fires necessary for volunteer firefighters to receive credit for service toward retirement and other benefits under this chapter and to establish the form of reports required to be filed with the board concerning such matters and the time within which such reports must be filed with the board. In no case shall the annual percentage be set by the board at less than 50 percent of all drills, meetings, and fires in any calendar year.

Any volunteer firefighter who fails to meet the attendance requirements relative to drills, meetings, and fires in this Code section, or such greater requirement as may be established by the board for the calendar year shall not be granted credit for such year’s service; and, in the event the member has paid any dues into the fund for such period, the member shall be entitled to a refund of 95 percent of such dues so paid.

The board is authorized to prescribe the monthly and annual hourly requirements in conjunction with the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council necessary to receive credit for service toward retirement and other benefits under this chapter and to establish the form of reports required to be filed with the board concerning such matters and the time within which such reports must be filed with the board. In no case shall the average weekly hourly requirement be less than 20 hours per week for any calendar year.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

History.

— Ga. L. 1956, p. 368, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 122, § 6/HB 344.

Editor’s notes.

— For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, and 02.15.21.01.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 368, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 122, § 6/HB 344.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, and 02.15.21.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

47-7-82.
Fire department employees other than firefighters or volunteer firefighters.

No person otherwise properly admitted to the fund shall be excluded from continuing membership therein solely because the member’s employment by or service with a fire department is not in the capacity of a firefighter or volunteer firefighter, but no credit shall be given for service rendered in any month by any member of the fund unless such service is rendered as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter and no benefits payable by the terms of this chapter to a firefighter or volunteer firefighter shall be payable to any member unless such member is serving as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter at the time such benefits are earned or become payable, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 47-7-43. For any period during which any member provides service which is not creditable, the member shall be deemed to be on leave of absence from the fund.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, a member may continue membership and may continue to earn credit for service rendered following the member’s appointment to an administrative position with a state, county, or municipal public safety unit, provided that a significant responsibility of such administrative position involves direct administrative oversight of the operation of a fire department under the jurisdiction of such public safety unit; and provided, further, that at the time of such appointment the member has acquired by service as a firefighter not less than 15 years of creditable service in the fund. As used in this subsection, the term “direct administrative oversight” means responsibility in a position having authority over the chief of a fire department for budget, personnel, operations, or purchasing functions relating to the fire-fighting functions of the fire department. Any member who was appointed to such an administrative position prior to July 1, 1992, shall receive credit for service rendered from the date of such appointment if such member pays all dues owing for such period, and the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 47-7-60 shall not apply to such period.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1310, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2525, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1.

47-7-83.
Service credit of member who is also member of Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund.

No credit shall be given for service rendered after April 1, 1989, by a member who is also a member of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund if such service is creditable under the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund to which such member belongs.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 339, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 476, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 264, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 54/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the subsection (a) designation and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “(b)(1) Any member who first became a member of the fund on or after July 1, 1993, and who is also a member of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund shall not be eligible for creditable service in the fund for any period after that date with respect to which such member is also entitled to any creditable service in the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund.

“(2) Any person who was a member of the fund on July 1, 1993, and who subsequent to that date was placed on a leave of absence from the fund by action of the board of trustees and who from that date to July 1, 1996, was continuously employed as a firefighter or who was continuously enrolled as a volunteer firefighter may, upon again becoming a regular, active member of the fund, obtain creditable service for 36 months of service by paying the regular dues which would have been made for each month of service if such leave of absence had not been imposed, provided that such member otherwise satisfied the requirements for creditable service during such period. Such payment must be made to the board of trustees not later than December 31, 1996.”

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 47-7-83, concerning credit for prior service, was based on Ga. L. 1984, p. 990, § 4 and was repealed by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1040, § 6 effective April 14, 1987.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-7-84.
Credit for prior eligible service by persons who are members as of September 1, 1992, or who applied for membership on or before that date.

As used in this Code section, the term “prior eligible service” means service:

Rendered by a member of the fund as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter;

Rendered without interruption prior to the date such member becomes a member of the fund;

Rendered after the member reached the age of 30 years; and

For which the member would otherwise have been eligible for credit if such member had been a member of the fund at the time such service was rendered;

provided, however, that such term shall not include a period of more than ten years of such service.

Any person who is a member of the fund on September 1, 1992, or who applies for membership on or before September 1, 1992, and is thereafter accepted for membership shall be entitled to credit for prior eligible service, provided that such person satisfies the following requirements:

The member or applicant for membership files with the board on or before September 1, 1992, an application for such credit in the form prescribed by the board;

At the time of application for credit, the member or applicant for membership pays to the fund for each month of prior eligible service credit sought an amount equal to the contributions that would have been made had the member or applicant been a member and entitled to credit during the period of prior eligible service, at the monthly contribution rate in effect at the time the application for credit is made, together with interest on such monthly amount from the date on which such contribution would have been made until the date of application for credit at a rate rounded to the nearest one-fourth of 1 percent which is equal to two and one-half percentage points plus the monthly index, expressed in terms of percentage interest per annum, of the monthly average of the daily yields on all outstanding United States Treasury Bonds issued, except such bonds as are redeemable at par for payment of federal estate taxes, with 30 years remaining to final maturity as compiled by the United States Treasury Department and as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System in the monthly Federal Reserve Bulletin for the month of July, 1992, but not in any event less than 8 percent per annum; and

At the time of application for credit, the member or applicant for membership is at least 35 years of age but not greater than 45 years of age.

Nothing in this Code section shall alter the requirements for membership in the fund or the limitations on membership or benefits of membership which would otherwise apply absent the benefit of prior eligible service credits under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2358, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1.

47-7-85.
Credit for prior eligible service by persons who are members as of July 1, 1998, or become members after that date.

As used in this Code section, the term “prior eligible service” means service:

Rendered by a member of the fund as a fireman or volunteer fireman; and

For which the member would otherwise have been eligible for credit if such member had been a member of the fund at the time such service was rendered.

Any person who is a member of the fund on July 1, 1998, or who becomes a member after that date shall be entitled to credit for up to ten years of prior eligible service, provided that such person satisfies the following requirements:

The member or applicant for membership files with the board an application for such credit in the form prescribed by the board; and

At the time of application for credit, the member or applicant for membership pays to the fund an amount sufficient to grant the creditable service authorized by this Code section without creating any actuarially determined accrued liability, as a result of granting such creditable service, against the fund, such determination to be made by the board after consultation with an actuary retained by the board.

Nothing in this Code section shall alter the requirements for membership in the fund or the limitations on membership or benefits of membership which would otherwise apply absent the benefit of prior eligible service credits under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 148, § 1.

47-7-86.
[Reserved] Creditable service for other pension fund participation for members of Georgia Class Nine Fire Department Pension Fund.

History.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 562, § 5; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 120, § 42/HB 749, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 120, § 42/HB 749 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2006.

47-7-87.
Credit for prior eligible service; requirements.

As used in this Code section, the term “prior eligible service” means service rendered between July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2014, as a firefighter in part-time employment.

Any member of the fund shall be entitled to credit for prior eligible service, provided that such person satisfies the following requirements:

The member or applicant for membership files with the board on or before September 30, 2014, an application for such credit in the form prescribed by the board; and

At the time of application for credit, the member or applicant for membership either:

Pays to the fund for each month of prior eligible service credit sought an amount equal to the contributions that would have been made had the member or applicant been a member and entitled to credit during the period of prior eligible service, at the monthly contribution rate in effect at the time the application for credit is made, together with interest on such monthly amount from the date on which such contribution would have been made until the date of application for credit at a rate of 12 percent per year; or

Presents proof that such contributions were timely paid during such period.

Nothing in this Code section shall alter the requirements for membership in the fund or the limitations on membership or benefits of membership which would otherwise apply absent the benefit of prior eligible service credits under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-87

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1507, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 478, § 1/SB 235.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “As used in this Code section, the term ‘prior eligible service’ means service:

“(1) Rendered by a member of the fund as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter;

“(2) Rendered without interruption prior to the date such member became a member of the fund; and

“(3) For which the member would otherwise have been eligible for credit if such member had been a member of the fund at the time such service was rendered;

“provided, however, that such term shall not include a period of more than five years of such service.”; in subsection (b), in the introductory paragraph, deleted “person who is a” following “Any” and deleted “on July 1, 2000, and who is at least 53 years old on that date” following “member of the fund”; substituted “September 30, 2014” for “September 1, 2000” in paragraph (b)(1); and, in paragraph (b)(2), substituted “either: (A) Pays to the fund” for “pays to the fund”, added “; or” at the end, and added subparagraph (b)(2)(B).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 47-7-86, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1507, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-7-87.

47-7-88.
Impact of active duty military service upon receipt of creditable service time.

The provisions of this Code section apply solely to any member of the fund who left active employment as a firefighter as a result of being called to active duty as a member of the Army or Air Force National Guard or the Army, Air Force, Navy, or Marine Corps Reserve and who returned to employment as a firefighter upon being released from such active duty.

Any member of the fund shall be entitled to receive creditable service for a period of break in service due to being called to active military duty. To receive such creditable service, a member must make application to the board and pay the normal monthly dues for each month of such period of break in service not later than one year following the member’s release from active duty and return to employment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-88

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 426, § 1/HB 660.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-7-89.
Calculating creditable service time.

The board is authorized to calculate creditable service on a monthly basis, expressed as a fraction of a year, for periods of time less than a year.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-89

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 426, § 1/HB 660.

47-7-90.
Impact of sentence of confinement on accrual of creditable service.

A member shall not earn creditable service for any service rendered during the time period in which the member is incarcerated under a sentence of confinement.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 168, § 2/HB 460.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.